Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4108
Advisory Council on Public Guardianship; duties; meetings; expenses.

(1) The council shall advise the Public Guardian on the administration of public guardianship and public conservatorship.

(2) The council shall meet at least four times per year and at other times deemed necessary to perform its functions upon the call of the chairperson. Members of the council shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 25.